Illinois, session 104th, SB45.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Humane Care for Animals Act is amended by 5changing Section 3.01 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 70/3.01)  (from Ch. 8, par. 703.01)7    Sec. 3.01. Cruel treatment. 8    (a) No person or owner may beat, cruelly treat, torment, 9starve, overwork or otherwise abuse any animal.10    (a-5) No person may intentionally drag or pull any bovine 11by its tail by any means for the purpose of entertainment, 12sport, practice, or contest. 13    (b) No owner may abandon any animal where it may become a 14public charge or may suffer injury, hunger or exposure.15    (c) No owner of a dog or cat that is a companion animal may 16expose the dog or cat in a manner that places the dog or cat in 17a life-threatening situation for a prolonged period of time in 18extreme heat or cold conditions that:19        (1) results in injury to or death of the animal; or20        (2) results in hypothermia, hyperthermia, frostbite, 21    or similar condition as diagnosed by a doctor of 22    veterinary medicine.23    (c-5) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit an animal   SB0045- 2 -LRB104 05568 BDA 15598 b1from being impounded in an emergency situation under 2subsection (b) of Section 12 of this Act.3    (c-10) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a law 4enforcement officer from taking temporary custody of a dog or 5cat that is a companion animal that is exposed in a manner that 6places the dog or cat in a life-threatening situation for a 7prolonged period of time in extreme heat or cold conditions 8that may result in injury or death of the dog or cat or may 9result in hypothermia, hyperthermia, frostbite, or similar 10condition. Upon taking temporary custody of the dog or cat 11under this subsection (c-10), the law enforcement officer 12shall attempt to contact the owner of the dog or cat and shall 13seek emergency veterinary care for the animal as soon as 14available. The law enforcement officer shall leave information 15of the location of the dog or cat if the owner cannot be 16reached. The owner of the dog or cat is responsible for any 17costs of providing care to the dog or cat. 18    (d) A person convicted of violating this Section is guilty 19of a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent conviction 20for a violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. In 21addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person who is 22convicted of violating subsection (a) upon a companion animal 23in the presence of a child, as defined in Section 12-0.1 of the 24Criminal Code of 2012, shall be subject to a fine of $250 and 25ordered to perform community service for not less than 100 26hours. In addition to any other penalty provided by law, upon   SB0045- 3 -LRB104 05568 BDA 15598 b1conviction for violating this Section, the court may order the 2convicted person to undergo a psychological or psychiatric 3evaluation and to undergo any treatment at the convicted 4person's expense that the court determines to be appropriate 5after due consideration of the evidence. If the convicted 6person is a juvenile or a companion animal hoarder, the court 7must order the convicted person to undergo a psychological or 8psychiatric evaluation and to undergo treatment that the court 9determines to be appropriate after due consideration of the 10evaluation.11(Source: P.A. 99-311, eff. 1-1-16; 99-357, eff. 1-1-16; 1299-642, eff. 7-28-16; 99-782, eff. 8-12-16; 100-740, eff. 131-1-19.)